incubator/apertium-pl-cs.cs.dix
    <pardef n="man__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ové</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ů</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ům</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ové</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ovi</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ech</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="plís/eň__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eň</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ně</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ně</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ní</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ním</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eň</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ně</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ně</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ni</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ních</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ní</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>němi</l>
          <r>eň<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="rampou/ch__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chy</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chu</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chů</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chu</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chům</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ch</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chy</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chu</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chy</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chu</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ších</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chem</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>chy</l>
          <r>ch<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pronáj/em__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mů</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mům</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>em</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>me</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mu</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mech</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mem</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>my</l>
          <r>em<s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="kapitán"><i>kapitán</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muslim"><i>muslim</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brunet"><i>brunet</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="denunciant"><i>denunciant</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kladiovoun"><i>kladiovoun</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuřbuřt"><i>kuřbuřt</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tlustoprd"><i>tlustoprd</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="patron"><i>patron</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="buzerant"><i>buzerant</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jeřáb"><i>jeřáb</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="man"><i>man</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="robot"><i>robot</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="plíseň"><i>plís</i><par n="plís/eň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="konfident"><i>konfident</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronom"><i>astronom</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kosmonaut"><i>kosmonaut</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="debil"><i>debil</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kretén"><i>kretén</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mamrd"><i>mamrd</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mrdkožrout"><i>mrdkožrout</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="blondýn"><i>blondýn</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snob"><i>snob</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kazimrd"><i>kazimrd</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zkundyksicht"><i>zkundyksicht</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="třešeň"><i>třeš</i><par n="plís/eň__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kamelot"><i>kamelot</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bolen"><i>bolen</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rampouch"><i>rampou</i><par n="rampou/ch__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pronájem"><i>pronáj</i><par n="pronáj/em__n"/></e>
    <e lm="expert"><i>expert</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hermafrodit"><i>hermafrodit</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zkurvysyn"><i>zkurvysyn</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zmrd"><i>zmrd</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vojín"><i>vojín</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prasomrd"><i>prasomrd</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anatom"><i>anatom</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spermohlt"><i>spermohlt</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cejn"><i>cejn</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kokot"><i>kokot</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hajzl"><i>hajzl</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="homosexuál"><i>homosexuál</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="candát"><i>candát</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primitiv"><i>primitiv</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lulin"><i>lulin</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="troll"><i>troll</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jesen"><i>jesen</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="primiciant"><i>primiciant</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="consil"><i>consil</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="introvert"><i>introvert</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hybrid"><i>hybrid</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adjuvant"><i>adjuvant</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
    <e lm="astronaut"><i>astronaut</i><par n="man__n"/></e>
